Missouri, session 2026, HB2412.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 361, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to
be known as sections 361.1040, 361.1042, 361.1044, and 361.1046, to read as follows:
361.1040. As used in sections 361.1040 to 361.1046, the following terms mean:
(1) "Director", the director of finance of the division of finance;
(2) "Division", the division of finance of the department of commerce and
insurance;
(3) "Foreign remittance transfer", a remittance transfer as defined in the
Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693o-1, as amended, the recipient of
which is located in any country other than the United States;
(4) "Licensee", a person licensed under sections 361.900 to 361.1035;
(5) "Person", any individual, general partnership, limited partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, trust, association, joint stock corporation, or other
corporate entity identified by the director of the division;
(6) "Unauthorized alien", a person who is unlawfully present in the United
States according to the terms of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C.
Section 1101, et seq. The term shall be interpreted consistently with any applicable
federal statutes, rules, or regulations.
361.1042. 1. In addition to the requirements specified under sections 361.900 to
361.1035, a licensee shall not initiate a foreign remittance transfer unless the licensee has
verified that the sender is not an unauthorized alien.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2412 2
2. A licensee shall provide to the division confirmation of verification that the
sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien on forms developed
by the division. The licensee shall submit the forms to the division not later than the
forty-fifth day following June thirtieth and December thirty-first.
3. (1) A licensee shall pay a penalty equal to twenty-five percent of the United
States dollar amount transferred, excluding any fees or charges imposed by the licensee,
for any foreign remittance transfer initiated in violation of subsection 1 of this section.
(2) Penalties owed under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be remitted not
later than the forty-fifth day following June thirtieth and December thirty-first to the
division in addition to any forms that the division may prescribe for such purpose.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, failure to comply with
subsection 1 or 2 of this section does not subject a licensee to any penalty other than the
penalty imposed under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. All moneys collected by the division under sections 361.1040 to 361.1046 shall
be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the county public school fund of the
several counties as required by Article IX, Section 7 of the Constitution of Missouri.
361.1044. 1. Each licensee who initiates a foreign remittance transfer under
sections 361.1040 to 361.1046 shall make, keep, and preserve the following books,
accounts, records, and documents for three years:
(1) A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation sold;
(2) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all assets, liability,
capital, income, and expense accounts;
(3) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(4) Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;
(5) Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation paid within the
three-year period;
(6) A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the licensee's
authorized delegates;
(7) Records of:
(a) The documentation used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance
transfer is not an unauthorized alien; and
(b) Penalties paid pursuant to subsection 3 of section 361.1042, including the
date and amount of each foreign remittance transfer and the name, date of birth, and
address of each sender;
(8) Any other records, as prescribed by rule, designed to detect and prevent the
unauthorized foreign remittance transfer; and
(9) Any other records the director may reasonably require by rule.

HCS HB 2412 3
2. The items required under subsection 1 of this section may be maintained in
any form of record. All records maintained by the licensee shall be open to inspection
by the director.
361.1046. 1. For the purpose of enforcement of sections 361.1040 to 361.1046,
the division may at any time request, and the licensee shall provide, records of
documentation used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an
unauthorized alien.
2. A person who has a good faith belief that a licensee has failed to comply with
sections 361.1040 to 361.1046 may file a written complaint with the division setting forth
supporting details. A person who knowingly files a false or frivolous complaint under
this subsection, including any complaint that violates federal law, shall be guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
3. Upon receipt of a valid complaint that is substantiated by evidence of a
violation of sections 361.1040 to 361.1046 after an investigation, the division shall notify
the licensee of the complaint and direct the licensee to pay the penalty required under
subsection 3 of section 361.1042.
4. In addition to the requirements under subsection 1 of this section, beginning
July 1, 2028, the division shall conduct random examinations of licensees to ensure
compliance with sections 361.1040 to 361.1046. During an examination or investigation,
a licensee shall produce records of the documentation used to verify that each sender of
a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien. A licensee that fails to
substantially comply with sections 361.1040 to 361.1046 is subject to the penalty under
subsection 3 of section 361.1042.
5. Failure to substantially comply with subsection 4 of this section constitutes
grounds for the suspension of all licenses held by the licensee that were issued by the
division.
6. The division shall not examine a licensee more than once every two years for
compliance with section 361.1042 unless an examination within the last six months
found the licensee to be in noncompliance with section 361.1042.
7. The division may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of sections 361.1040 to 361.1046, including the adoption of rules
governing the procedures and forms necessary to implement such sections. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to

HCS HB 2412 4
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔